Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1819
Payment of compensation; order; losses covered.

The committee or hearing officer may order the payment of compensation to victims of crime and survivors of victims of crime for:

(1) Expenses actually and reasonably incurred as a result of the personal injury or death of the victim, including expenses for mental health counseling and care;

(2) Loss of wages and future earning capacity as a result of total or partial incapacity of the victim and reasonable expenses of job retraining or similar employment-oriented rehabilitative services for the victim;

(3) Pecuniary loss to the dependents of the deceased victim;

(4) Funeral and burial expenses actually and reasonably incurred as a result of the death of the victim; and

(5) Any other loss resulting from the personal injury or death of the victim which the committee determines to be reasonable.

Laws 1978, LB 910, § 19;

Laws 1986, LB 540, § 20.

Children of murdered woman were not entitled to recover for loss of mother's love and affection under Crime Victim's Reparations Act. Lambert v. Nebraska Cr. Vict. Rep. Bd., 214 Neb. 817, 336 N.W.2d 320 (1983).